Alabama, session 2026rs, HB511.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
(a) Each local board of education shall adopt a policy
requiring each public K-12 school under its jurisdiction, at
the commencement of the first class each school day, to do
both of the following:
(1) Conduct The Pledge of Allegiance to the United
States flag and give all students the opportunity to
voluntarily recite The Pledge of Allegiance to the United
States flag.
(2) Conduct a prayer, provided that no student may be
required to recite a prayer. The prayer may be broadcast over
the public address system and may be prerecorded or recited
live.
(b) Violations of this section may be reported to the
Page 2

(b) Violations of this section may be reported to the
local superintendent of education. The local superintendent of
education shall review the violation. If the local
superintendent of education determines the report is founded
and the violation is not resolved, he or she shall report the
violation to the State Superintendent of Education, who shall
conduct an investigation. If the State Superintendent of
Education, based on the results of the investigation,
determines that a local board of education or any school under
that local board's jurisdiction has shown a continued pattern
of intentional refusal to comply with this section, the State
Superintendent of Education shall withhold 25 percent of the
state funding allocated to that local board of education for
the following fiscal year. If the local board of education or
any school under that board's jurisdiction continues to
violate this section, the Legislature shall provide for
further reduction of funding to the local board of education
in the annual appropriation of education funds.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END OF PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
Page 3

Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284 and 285 of the
Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws of this
state. The appropriate election official shall assign a ballot
number for the proposed constitutional amendment on the
election ballot and shall set forth the following description
of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Proposing an amendment to the Constitution of Alabama
of 2022, to require local boards of education to adopt
policies requiring each public K-12 school to recite The
Pledge of Allegiance to the United States flag and conduct a
prayer at the commencement of the first class each school day;
and to provide a mechanism for the withholding of state funds
from local boards of education that fail to adhere to this
amendment.
100 Proposed by Act ____."
101 This description shall be followed by the following
102 language:
103 "Yes( ) No( )."
104 Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
105 a part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved
106 by a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 4